Texas statutes.
WATER CODE

TITLE 4. GENERAL LAW DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 63. SELF-LIQUIDATING NAVIGATION DISTRICTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 63.001. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:

(1) "District" means a self-liquidating navigation district.

(2) "Board" means the navigation board.

(3) "Commission" means the board of navigation and canal commissioners.

(4) "Commissioner" means a member of the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER B. CREATION OF DISTRICT; CONVERSION OF DISTRICT

Sec. 63.021. SELF-LIQUIDATING DISTRICTS. (a) All navigation districts organized under the provisions of Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution, and the provisions of Chapter 62 of this code, or organized under any local and special law enacted under the provisions of Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution, which have voted bonds but have not issued or disposed of the bonds, and all districts organized under the provisions of this chapter are self-liquidating in character and may be made self-supporting and return the construction cost of the district within a reasonable period by tolls, rents, fees, assessments, or other charges other than taxation.

(b) The district shall be considered as coming originally within the scope of this chapter, and the proceedings in Sections 63.039-63.044 of this code are not required as a prerequisite to the exercise of the rights, powers, privileges, and benefits of this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.022. CREATION. A district of the character provided in Section 63.021 of this code may be created as provided in this chapter to operate under the provisions of Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.023. AREA INCLUDED IN DISTRICT. A district may include all or part of a village, town, city, road district, drainage district, irrigation district, levee district, other improvement district, conservation and reclamation district, or municipal corporation, but may not include more than all or parts of two counties.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.024. PETITION TO CREATE SINGLE-COUNTY DISTRICT. (a) To create a district located wholly in one county, a petition signed by 25 of the electors, or if there are fewer than 75 electors in the proposed district, by one-third of them, shall be presented at any regular or special session of the commissioners court of the county in which the land to be included in the district is located.

(b) The petition shall include:

(1) a request for the establishment of a district;

(2) a description of the boundaries of the proposed district, accompanied by a map;

(3) a statement of the general nature of the improvements proposed;

(4) an estimate of the probable cost; and

(5) the designation of a name for the district which shall include the name of the county.

(c) A deposit of $500 and an affidavit stating the qualifications of the petitioners shall accompany the petition.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.025. PETITION TO CREATE DISTRICT IN TWO COUNTIES. (a) If the proposed district is located in two counties, a petition of the nature provided in Section 63.024 shall be presented to the commissioners court of the county which includes the greater part of the district, and this county shall be the county of jurisdiction with relation to all matters concerning the district.

(b) The petition shall be signed by 25 residents in the territory of each county to be included in the proposed district or if there are fewer than 75 residents in the territory of either of the counties, then by one-third of the residents and shall be accompanied by a deposit of $500.

(c) The name of the district shall include the name of the county which has jurisdiction.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.026. NAVIGATION BOARD. (a) The navigation board shall include the county judge and the members of the commissioners court and the mayor and the aldermen or commissioners of the city or cities.

(b) A majority in number of the persons composing the board shall constitute a quorum, and the action of a majority of the quorum shall control.

(c) The board shall pass on the petition to create the district and the election to approve creation of the district with each individual member having one vote.

(d) The duties and powers of the county judge and members of the commissioners court, the mayor and aldermen or commissioners of cities, and the county clerk and other officers are a part of the legal duties of the officials which they shall perform without additional compensation, unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.027. HEARING. At the same session the petition is presented, the commissioners court shall order a hearing to be held at a regular or special session of the commissioners court, not less than 60 days from the date the petition is presented.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.028. NOTICE OF HEARING. (a) The commissioners court shall order the clerk to give notice of the date and place of the hearing by posting a copy of the petition and the order of the commissioners court at the courthouse door and at four other public places inside the boundaries of the proposed district.

(b) If the district is composed of more than one county, the notices provided in Subsection (a) of this section shall be posted in each county.

(c) The notices shall be posted not less than 20 days immediately preceding the day set for the hearing.

(d) The clerk is entitled to receive $1 for each notice he posts and five cents a mile for each mile necessarily traveled to post the notices.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.029. HEARING BY NAVIGATION BOARD. (a) If the proposed district includes all or part of a city acting under special charter granted by the legislature, the hearing shall be held before the board at the regular meeting place of the commissioners court.

(b) The commissioners court shall order a hearing before the board not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the day the petition is presented without reference to any term of the court, and notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Section 63.028.

(c) The county clerk shall record the proceedings of the board in the book kept for that purpose, and this record shall be available for public inspection.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.030. CONDUCT OF HEARING. (a) The commissioners court or the board has exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine all contests and objections to the creation of the proposed district and all matters relating to the creation of the proposed district.

(b) The commissioners court or the board may adjourn the hearing from day to day, and all judgments or decisions shall be final unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(c) Any person who has taxable property in the proposed district or who might be affected by creation of the district may appear at the hearing and support or oppose creation of the proposed district and may offer testimony relating to:

(1) the necessity and feasibility of the proposed district;

(2) the benefits to accrue from formation of the proposed district;

(3) the boundaries of the proposed district; or

(4) any other matter concerning the proposed district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.031. FINDINGS. (a) If it appears at the hearing that the proposed improvements are feasible and practicable and would be a public benefit and utility, the commissioners court or the board shall make these findings and approve the boundaries stated in the petition, or if it does not approve the boundaries in the petition, the court or board shall define the boundaries of the district which are approved.

(b) Changes may not be made in the proposed boundaries until notice is given and a hearing held in the manner provided in this subchapter.

(c) If the commissioners court or board finds that the proposed improvement is not feasible or practicable, or that it would not be a public benefit or public utility and that the establishment of the district is unnecessary, the court or board shall make these findings and dismiss the petition at the cost of petitioners. Dismissal of the petition shall not prevent presentation of another petition at a later date.

(d) The commissioners court or the board shall enter all findings in its records or minutes, together with a map of the district if the boundaries in the petition are changed.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.032. PROVIDING FUNDS FOR PROPOSED IMPROVEMENTS. (a) If the commissioners court or the board approves the boundaries in the petition or as changed and decides to grant the petition, it shall determine the amount of money necessary for the improvements and all expenses connected with the improvements and whether to issue bonds for the full amount or, in the first instance, for a less amount.

(b) The commissioners court or the board shall specify the amount of bonds to be issued, the maximum term for which the bonds will run, and the rate of interest.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.033. ELECTION ORDER. (a) If the commissioners court or the board finds in favor of the creation of the district, the commissioners court of the county of jurisdiction shall order an election and submit to the electors residing in the district the proposition of whether or not the district shall be created and whether or not the bonds shall be issued and a tax levied sufficient to pay the interest and provide a sinking fund to redeem the bonds at maturity.

(b) The election order shall specify the amount of the bonds to be issued, the term for which the bonds will run, and the rate of interest.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.034. NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The clerk of the court of jurisdiction shall give notice of the election by posting notices at the courthouse door of the county in which the district is located and at four other public places in the proposed district.

(b) If the district is composed of more than one county, the notices shall be posted in each county.

(c) The notices shall be posted for 30 days immediately preceding the time set for the election.

(d) The notices shall include:

(1) the time and place of the election;

(2) the proposition to be voted on;

(3) the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued;

(4) the amount of the bonds; and

(5) a copy of the election order.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.035. BALLOTS. The ballots for the election shall be printed to provide for voting for or against: "The navigation district and the issuance of bonds and the levy of a tax to pay for the bonds."

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.036. CONDUCT OF ELECTION. The commissioners court shall create and define, by order, the voting precincts in the district and shall name convenient polling places in the precincts. It shall appoint the judges and other necessary election officials and shall hold the election at the earliest legal time.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.037. RETURNS OF ELECTION. (a) Immediately after the election, the officers holding the election shall make returns of the result to the commissioners court of jurisdiction and return the ballot boxes to the clerk of the court.

(b) The clerk shall keep the ballot boxes safely and deliver them, together with the returns of the election, to the commissioners court at its next regular or special session.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.038. DECLARATION OF RESULT. The court shall canvass the vote and return at the session when it receives the ballot boxes and returns of the election. If it finds that a majority of those voting at the election voted in favor of the proposition, the court shall declare the result of the election to be in favor of the district, issuance of the bonds, and the levy of the tax, and shall enter the following declaration in its minutes:

"Commissioners Court of __________ County, Texas, __________ term A.D. __________, in the matter of the petition of __________ and __________ and others praying for the establishment of a navigation district, and issuance of bonds and levy of taxes in said petition described and designated by the name of __________ Navigation District. Be it known that at an election called for the purpose in said district, held on the __________ day of __________ A.D. __________ a majority of the electors voting thereon voted in favor of the creation of said navigation district, and the issuance of bonds and levy of a tax. Now, therefore, it is considered and ordered by the court that said navigation district be, and the same is hereby established by the name of __________ Navigation District, and that bonds of said district in the amount of __________ dollars be issued, and a tax of __________ cents on the $100, valuation, or so much thereof as may be necessary to be levied upon all property within said navigation district, whether real, personal, mixed or otherwise, sufficient in amount to pay the interest on such bonds and provide a sinking fund to redeem that at maturity, and that if said tax shall at any time become insufficient for such purpose same shall be increased until same is sufficient. The metes and bounds of said district being as follows: (Giving metes and bounds)."

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.039. CONVERSION OF DISTRICT. Any navigation district organized under the provisions of Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution, or Article III, Section 52, of the Texas Constitution, and not originally within the scope of this chapter, may be converted into a self-liquidating district operating under this chapter in the manner provided in Sections 63.040-63.044 of this code.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.040. RESOLUTION TO CONVERT. (a) The commission, by resolution entered in the minutes, shall declare that in its judgment it is for the best interest of the district and will benefit the land and property in the district to operate under the provisions of this chapter, permitting the district to become self-liquidating and to return the construction cost within a reasonable period by means of tolls, rents, fees, assessments, or other charges other than taxation.

(b) The commission shall designate in the resolution the sections of this chapter under which the district wishes to operate.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.041. NOTICE. (a) Notice of the adoption of a resolution under Section 63.040 of this code shall be given by publishing the resolution in a newspaper with general circulation in the county or counties in which the district is located.

(b) The notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks with the first publication not less than 14 full days before the day set for a hearing.

(c) The notice shall:

(1) state the time and place of the hearing;

(2) set out the resolution in full; and

(3) notify all interested persons to appear and offer testimony for or against the proposal contained in the resolution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.042. HEARING. The hearing may be adjourned from day to day until all interested persons have had an opportunity to appear and present testimony.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.043. FINDINGS. (a) If at the hearing the commission finds that conversion of the district into a district operating under this chapter would serve the best interest of the district and would be a benefit to the land and property included in the district, it shall enter an order making this finding.

(b) If the commission finds that the conversion of the district would not serve the best interest of the district and would not be a benefit to the land and property included in the district, it shall enter an order against conversion of the district into one operating under this chapter.

(c) The adverse findings of the commission shall be final and not subject to appeal or review.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.044. EFFECT OF CONVERSION. If the finding of the commission is favorable to the resolution, the commission shall have the same right, power, and authority to act under the provisions of this chapter adopted by the resolution as if the district had originally come within the scope of this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER C. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 63.081. APPOINTMENT OF COMMISSIONERS. After a district is created, the commissioners court shall appoint three navigation and canal commissioners, whose duties are provided in this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.082. QUALIFICATIONS. To be qualified for appointment as a commissioner, a person must be a resident of the district, a freehold property taxpayer, and a qualified elector of the county.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.083. VACANCIES. All vacancies in the office of appointed commissioner occurring through death, resignation, or otherwise shall be filled by the remaining commissioners or, if only one commissioner remains, by the remaining commissioner and the district judge residing in the county in which a majority of the acreage of the district is located.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.084. OATH. In addition to the constitutional oath provided for county commissioners, before beginning to perform his duties each appointed commissioner shall take and subscribe before the county judge of the county of jurisdiction an oath to discharge faithfully the duties of his office without favor or partiality.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.085. BOND. Before beginning to perform his duties, each appointed commissioner shall execute a good and sufficient bond for $1,000, payable to the county judge of the county of jurisdiction for the use and benefit of the district, conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.086. TERM OF OFFICE. Each commissioner shall hold office for four years and until his successor has qualified after appointment or election.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5217, ch. 951, Sec. 14, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 63.087. OPTIONAL TERM OF OFFICE. (a) The commission may provide by resolution for six-year staggered terms of office for commissioners with the term of one commissioner expiring every two years.

(b) At the first election of commissioners after a resolution is adopted under this section, three commissioners shall be elected. After the commissioners have taken the oath of office and executed bonds, they shall draw lots to determine who will serve for a two-year term, who will serve for a four-year term, and who will serve for a six-year term.

(c) Successors to the commissioners elected under the provisions of Subsection (b) of this section shall serve for full six-year terms.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.088. COMMISSION ORGANIZATION AND QUORUM. The commission shall organize by electing one of their members chairman and one secretary. Two of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum and a concurrence of two shall be sufficient in all matters relating to the business of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.089. ELECTION OF COMMISSIONERS. (a) An election shall be held in the district on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even numbered year to elect the three commissioners. However, the commissioners may, by adopting an order duly entered on the minutes, determine to hold the election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in October of each even numbered year to elect the commissioners authorized by law.

(b) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, requiring that certain elections be held on specified uniform dates, and Section 41.003, Election Code, allowing only certain elections to be held on the date of the general election for state and county officers, do not apply to the election provided for in this section.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1984, ch. 612, art. 1, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1129, ch. 427, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1973; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 522, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 63.0895. JOINT ELECTION WITH COUNTY. (a) The commission of a district that is situated wholly in one county and that holds its commissioners' election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year may, by adopting an order duly entered on the minutes, elect to hold the commissioners' election jointly with the general election for state and county officers as provided by this section. Not later than the 90th day before election day, a copy of the order shall be mailed to the county election officer.

(b) The commission shall order the commissioners' election not later than the 70th day before election day.

(c) The commission shall give notice of the commissioners' election in the manner provided by Section 63.093(a) of this code. The notice must state the official mailing address to which voters of the district may mail applications for absentee ballots to be voted by mail. The notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the district or, if a newspaper is not published in the district, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The first publication shall be made not later than the 65th day nor earlier than the 70th day before election day.

(d) A candidate for the office of commissioner must file documents as required by Title 15, Election Code, with the secretary.

(e) A candidate for commissioner must file an application for a place on the ballot with the secretary not later than 5 p.m. of the 56th day before election day. In addition, a candidate's name may be placed on the ballot by petition of 20 or more qualified electors of the district filed with the secretary by the filing deadline.

(f) The county election officer shall establish the election precincts for the commissioners' election. The election precincts shall be coterminous with county election precincts to the extent permitted by district boundaries.

(g) The county commissioners court shall designate common polling places in the appropriate county election precincts for use in the joint election. The voters of the district may be served by a polling place located outside the boundary of the district if the location can adequately and conveniently serve the affected voters and will facilitate the orderly conduct of the election.

(h) The county election officer is the absentee voting clerk for the commissioners' election.

(i) An election officer, including a member of the absentee ballot board, appointed to serve in the general election for state and county officers shall serve in the same office in the commissioners' election. A person who is eligible to serve as an election officer in the general election for state and county officers is eligible to serve in the same office in the commissioners' election.

(j) The county election officer, subject to the approval of the county election board, shall procure, allocate, and distribute the equipment, ballots, forms, list of registered voters, and other materials necessary to conduct the commissioners' election.

(k) The county election officer shall prepare a single ballot containing all the offices to be voted on at a common polling place. The office of commissioner shall appear on the ballot after the precinct offices of the county government. The secretary shall certify in writing for placement on the ballot the name and address of each candidate for the office of commissioner. The certification shall be delivered to the county election officer not later than the 55th day before election day.

(l) If an election precinct established under Subsection (f) of this section consists of only part of a county election precinct, the county election officer shall deliver to the presiding election judge a current description of the district boundary and a map, if a map is available. The county election officer shall deliver the district boundary information not later than the 30th day before election day.

(m) The secretary of state shall prescribe any procedures necessary to ensure that a voter is permitted to vote on the office of commissioner only if the voter is a resident of the district.

(n) One set of ballot boxes shall be used at a common polling place for the deposit of ballots. The forms and records maintained at a common polling place shall be combined in a manner convenient and adequate to record and report the results of each election.

(o) The county election officer is the general custodian of election records for the commissioners' election.

(p) The precinct election returns for the joint election shall be canvassed by the county commissioners court. The county judge shall promptly deliver the results of the commissioners' election to the commission.

(q) The commission shall issue a certificate of election to a candidate elected to the office of commissioner.

(r) The county election officer and election officers, including members of the absentee ballot board, appointed to serve in the general election for state and county officers, are entitled to additional compensation for serving in the commissioners' election only if additional compensation is provided by the commission.

(s) The commission shall reimburse the county election officer for the expenses incurred in the conduct of the joint election that would not have been incurred if the general election for state and county officers had been held separately from the commissioners' election.

(t) Sections 63.090, 63.091, 63.092, 63.093(b), and 63.094 of this chapter do not apply to a commissioners' election held under this section.

(u) In this section, "county election officer" means the county elections administrator in counties having that position, the county tax assessor-collector in counties in which the county clerk's election duties and functions have been transferred to the tax assessor-collector, and the county clerk in other counties.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 522, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 63.090. PLACING NAMES OF CANDIDATES ON BALLOT. A candidate for commissioner must file an application with the secretary not later than 5 p.m. of the 45th day before the date of the election to have the candidate's name printed on the ballot. Also, a candidate's name may be placed on the ballot by petition of 20 or more qualified electors of the district filed with the secretary by the deadline stated in the preceding sentence.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1009, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 63.091. POLLING PLACE. The commission shall designate the polling place or places in the election order. If more than one polling place is required, the board shall divide the district into election precincts, which may be changed from time to time.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.092. ELECTION OFFICERS. The commission shall appoint the election officers, consisting of one presiding judge, an assistant judge, and two clerks, when the election is ordered. Additional clerks may be appointed by the presiding judge when necessary.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.093. NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The notice of the election shall be signed by the president and secretary of the commission and shall contain a copy of the election order.

(b) The notice shall be published once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the district or, if a newspaper is not published in the district, in a newspaper located nearest to the boundaries of the district. The first publication shall be made not less than 32 days nor more than 46 days before the day of the election.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.094. CONDUCT OF ELECTION. (a) The election officers shall make and deliver the returns in triplicate. One copy shall be retained by the presiding judge, one shall be delivered to the chairman of the commission, and one shall be delivered to the secretary.

(b) The ballot boxes and other election records and supplies shall be delivered to the secretary at the office of the district. All boxes containing voted or mutilated ballots shall be preserved for six months, subject to the order of any court in which an election contest is filed. The ballot boxes shall be destroyed after six months unless a contrary order is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) The commission shall meet and canvass the returns of the election not less than five full days nor more than seven days after the election. If the returns cannot be canvassed within seven days, they shall be canvassed as soon as possible after seven days.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.0945. WRITE-IN CANDIDATES. (a) In an election to elect a commissioner, a write-in vote may not be counted unless the name written in appears on the list of write-in candidates.

(b) To be entitled to a place on the list of write-in candidates, a candidate must make a declaration of write-in candidacy.

(c) A declaration of write-in candidacy must be filed with the authority with whom an application for a place on the ballot is required to be filed in the election.

(d) A declaration of write-in candidacy must be filed not later than the deadline prescribed by Section 146.054, Election Code, for a write-in candidate in a city election.

(e) Subchapter B, Chapter 146, Election Code, applies to write-in voting in an election to elect a commissioner except to the extent of a conflict with this subchapter.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318, Sec. 51(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1343, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 925, Sec. 8, eff. Nov. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 2339), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 48, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 51(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 63.095. VACANCIES ON COMMISSION. (a) A vacancy in the office of elected commissioner shall be filled by appointment by the commission itself for the unexpired term.

(b) If two vacancies occur at the same time, the remaining commissioner shall call a special election to fill the vacancies.

(c) If the remaining commissioner fails to call a special election within 15 days after the vacancies occur, or if the third place is vacant also, the judge of the district court of the judicial district in which the district is located may order the election on the petition of any voter or creditor of the district. The district judge shall fix the date of the election, order the publication of notice of the election by the county clerk, and name the officers to hold the election. The returns of an election held by order of the district judge shall be made and filed in the office of the clerk of the district court, and the clerk shall declare the result of the election.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.096. COMMISSIONER'S OATH. Each commissioner shall subscribe an oath of office containing the applicable conditions provided by law for members of the commissioners court.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.097. COMMISSIONER'S BOND. (a) Each commissioner shall execute a good and sufficient bond for $1,000, payable to the district, conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties.

(b) The commissioner's bond shall be approved by the commission and by the district judge of the district court which has jurisdiction over the territory of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1129, ch. 427, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 1973.

Sec. 63.098. COMMISSIONER'S COMPENSATION. (a) Each commissioner shall receive a fee of not more than $50 a day for each day of service necessary to the discharge of his duties, unless otherwise provided in accordance with Subsection (b) of this section.

(b) The commission may provide by an order entered in its minutes that compensation shall not be paid for the commissioners' services for a period of more than two years from the date of the order.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1984, ch. 612, art. 1, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 159, ch. 79, Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 1977.

Sec. 63.099. DISTRICT MANAGER. (a) The commission may employ a general manager and give him full authority in the management and operation of the affairs of the district, subject only to the supervision of the commission.

(b) The commission shall fix the term of office and compensation of the manager.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.100. DISTRICT ASSESSOR AND COLLECTOR. The commission shall appoint one person to the office of assessor and collector for the district. The assessor and collector shall be a qualified elector and a resident of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.101. DEPUTY ASSESSOR AND COLLECTOR. The commission may appoint one or more deputies to assist the assessor and collector for a period of not more than one year.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.103. DEPUTY'S BOND. The assistant or assistants to the assessor and collector appointed by the commission may or may not be required to furnish bond with conditions similar to those required of the assessor and collector.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.104. COMPENSATION OF ASSESSOR AND COLLECTOR AND DEPUTY. The commission shall fix the compensation to be paid to the tax assessor and collector or any deputy.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.1045. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. (a) The district may employ an executive director of the district. If the district employs an executive director, the district must prescribe the duties and compensation of the executive director.

(b) The duties of an executive director may be performed by a general manager, port director, or chief executive officer.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 10, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 63.105. ENGINEER. The district may employ a competent engineer whose term of office and compensation shall be determined by the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 11, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 63.106. LEGAL COUNSEL. The commission may employ an attorney to represent the district in preparation of any contract, to conduct any proceeding in or out of court, to be the legal advisor of the commission, and to perform any other function considered necessary. The attorney shall be retained on the terms and for the fees which the commission determines and on which the parties agree.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.107. DISTRICT EMPLOYEES. (a) The district:

(1) may employ assistant engineers and other persons as it considers necessary for the construction, maintenance, operation, and development of the district and its business and facilities; and

(2) shall determine their term of office and duties and fix their compensation.

(b) All employees may be removed by the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 12, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 63.108. BONDS OF OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES. (a) Each officer and employee charged with the handling of funds or property of the district shall furnish a good and sufficient bond for a sum sufficient to safeguard the district as determined by the commission. The bond shall be payable to the district and conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties and his accounting of all funds and property of the district coming into his hands.

(b) The bonds of other officers of the district shall be approved by the commission and shall be filed for record in the office of the district. The bonds shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose in the office of the district, and the book shall be open to the inspection of the public during the office hours of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.109. PAYMENT OF COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES. The district may draw warrants, issue checks, or use a payment method adopted under Section 60.271 to pay for:

(1) services;

(2) the compensation of employees; and

(3) all expenses incident and relating to the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 13, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 63.110. DISTRICT OFFICE. A regular office shall be maintained for the conduct of the business of the district at a place in the district designated by the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.112. COURT ACTIONS. (a) A district established under this chapter may sue and be sued, by and through its commission, in any court in this state in the name of the district.

(b) The courts of this state shall take judicial notice of the establishment of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 63.151. AUTHORITY OF DISTRICT. All districts created under this chapter are essential to the accomplishment of the provisions of Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution, and are governmental agencies and bodies politic and corporate, with the powers of government and authority to exercise the rights, privileges, and functions conferred in this chapter and by the Texas Constitution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.152. PURPOSES OF DISTRICT. The district may make improvements for:

(1) the navigation of inland and coastal water;

(2) the preservation and conservation of inland and coastal water for navigation;

(3) the control and distribution of storm water and floodwater of rivers and streams in aid of navigation; or

(4) any purpose stated in Article XVI, Section 59, of the Texas Constitution, necessary or incidental to the navigation of inland and coastal water.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.153. GENERAL AUTHORITY OF DISTRICT. A district may:

(1) exercise all the rights, powers, and authority granted by this chapter and by the general and special laws relating to navigation districts;

(2) exercise all powers relating to regulation of wharfage and facilities connected with waterways and ports inside the district to the fullest extent consistent with the Texas Constitution;

(3) acquire, purchase, own, construct, enlarge, extend, repair, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate land, waterways, improvements, facilities, or aids incident to or necessary in the proper operation and development of ports and waterways in the district, including wharves, docks, warehouses, commercial and industrial buildings, grain elevators, bunkering facilities, belt railroads, floating plants and facilities, lightering facilities, towing facilities, and all appurtenances;

(4) hire, rent, convey, lease, and otherwise make available to any person the improvements of the district;

(5) assess and collect charges for use of all facilities acquired or constructed in accordance with this chapter and apply the amounts collected for maintenance and operation of the business of the district, to make the district self-supporting and financially solvent, and to retire the construction cost of the improvements within a reasonable period;

(6) enter into valid and binding contracts to apply revenues, over and above the maintenance and operation costs, which are derived from sources other than taxation, to pay principal and interest on bonds;

(7) enter into contracts with the United States for loans and grants on terms and conditions necessary to comply with regulations and requirements of the United States under federal law; and

(8) issue bonds, notes, warrants, certificates of indebtedness, and other forms of obligation payable from revenues derived from improvements and pledge these revenues to the payment of the district's debts in the manner provided in Subchapter E of Chapter 60 of this code.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.154. AUTHORITY TO GO ON LAND. The commission and the district engineer, together with all necessary teams, help, tools, instruments, implements, and machinery, may go on any land inside the district to examine the land and make plans, surveys, maps, and profiles without subjecting themselves to action for trespass.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.155. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTY AND RIGHT-OF-WAY. The commission may acquire by gift, purchase, or condemnation proceedings the necessary right-of-way and property of any kind necessary for improvements contemplated by this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.156. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to condemn and acquire the right-of-way over and through any public or private land necessary to improve any river, bay, creek, or arm of the Gulf of Mexico for the construction and maintenance of any canal or waterway and for any other purpose authorized by this chapter.

(b) The condemnation proceedings shall be instituted under the direction of the commission and in the name of the district, and the damages shall be assessed in conformity with the laws for condemning and acquiring rights-of-way by railroads.

(c) No appeal from the finding and assessment of damages shall have the effect of suspending work by the commission in prosecuting the work of improvement in detail.

(d) No right-of-way can be condemned through any part of an incorporated city or town without the consent of the lawful authorities of the city or town.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.157. AUTHORITY OVER IMPROVEMENTS. A district may acquire, purchase, take over, construct, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate wharves, docks, warehouses, grain elevators, bunkering facilities, belt railroads, floating plants, literage, lands, towing facilities, and all other facilities or aids incident to or necessary to the operation or development of ports or waterways inside the district extending to the Gulf of Mexico.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.158. OBTAINING CONSENT OF UNITED STATES. If a river, creek, bay, stream, canal, or waterway which is to be improved is navigable or if the improvements are of a type which require the permission or consent of the United States, the commission may obtain the permission or consent of the United States.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.159. COOPERATION WITH THE UNITED STATES. (a) The commission may cooperate and act with the United States in surveys, work, and expenditure of money in any matters relating to construction and maintenance of the canals and the improvement and navigation of navigable rivers, bays, creeks, streams, canals, and waterways.

(b) To the extent that the United States aids in these matters, the commission may agree and consent to the United States entering and taking management and control of the work insofar as necessary or permissible under the laws and regulations of the United States.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.160. DUTIES OF ENGINEER. The engineer shall:

(1) make necessary surveys, examinations, investigations, maps, plans, and drawings relating to proposed improvements;

(2) estimate the cost of improvements;

(3) supervise the work of improvements; and

(4) perform any duties which might be required by the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.161. UNITED STATES PERFORMING DUTIES OF ENGINEER. Instead of or in addition to employing an engineer, the commission may adopt any survey of a river, creek, canal, stream, bay, or waterway previously made by the United States and may arrange for surveys, examinations, and investigations of proposed improvements and for supervision of the work of improvement by the United States.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.162. DISTRICT ORDER FOR IMPROVEMENTS. If the commission considers it in the best interest for the district to exercise the powers granted by Section 63.153 of this code or if the commission finds that additional improvements to those originally planned or constructed are necessary for navigation of or in aid of navigation of any river, creek, stream, bay, canal, or waterway, the commission shall make this finding in an order entered in the minutes and shall direct the engineer to make an estimate showing the character and cost of the improvements.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.163. NOTICE OF HEARING. (a) After the commission's order is entered in the minutes, the commission shall publish notice once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the district. If no newspaper is published in the district, the notice shall be published in the newspaper published nearest to the district.

(b) The notice shall include a copy of the commission's order and shall designate a time and place for a hearing.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.164. HEARING ON IMPROVEMENTS. (a) The commission shall hear evidence at the hearing, and any district taxpayer or interested person may present evidence.

(b) The commission may adjourn the hearing from day to day for a reasonable time so that all taxpayers and interested persons may be heard.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.165. FINDINGS. (a) After the hearing is completed, the commission shall enter its order making findings as to whether or not the improvements and construction of the facilities is feasible and practicable and whether or not benefits will result to the public.

(b) If the findings are against the proposed improvements, no further action will be taken, but if the commission finds that the improvements are feasible and practicable and would be a public benefit, the district may issue bonds to pay for the necessary improvements and facilities.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.166. BOND ELECTION. (a) An election shall be held to approve the issuance of the bonds.

(b) The ballots shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "The issuance of bonds and the levy of a tax to pay for the bonds."

(c) The returns of the election shall be canvassed as provided in this chapter.

(d) If the canvass indicates that a majority of the electors voted in favor of the proposition, the commission shall issue an order directing the issuance of the bonds and the levy of a tax.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.167. FORM OF BONDS. (a) The bonds shall be issued in the manner that other bonds are issued under this chapter, and the amount of the bonds may not be more than the cost of the improvements estimated by the engineer.

(b) The bonds shall be issued in the name of the district and shall be signed by the president of the commission and attested by the secretary with the seal of the district attached.

(c) The bonds shall be issued in the denominations and payable at the times, not more than 40 years, considered most expedient by the board. Interest shall be payable annually or semiannually.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.168. BIDS FOR CONTRACT. (a) Before the commission enters into a contract requiring the expenditure of more than $15,000, it shall submit the proposed contract for competitive bids.

(b) The commission may reject any and all bids, and if the contract is for a public improvement, the successful bidder shall be required to give the statutory bonds required by Chapter 2253, Government Code.

(c) The contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 805, ch. 299, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 757, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 63.169. NOTICE OF BIDS. (a) Notice of the time and place the contract will be awarded shall be published in one or more newspapers with general circulation in the state, one of which shall be a newspaper published in the county in which the district is located if a newspaper is published in the county.

(b) The notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks before the time set for awarding the contract, with the first publication being made at least 14 days before the day for awarding the contract.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.170. APPLICATION OF CERTAIN SECTIONS. The provisions of Sections 63.168-63.169 of this code do not apply to:

(1) improvements carried out and performed by the United States;

(2) calamities or emergencies which make it necessary to act at once to preserve the property of the district;

(3) unforeseen damage to district property, machinery, or equipment or necessary emergency repairs to them; or

(4) contracts for personal or professional services or work done by the district and paid for by the day as the work progresses.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.171. PROCEDURE FOR BIDS. (a) Any person desiring to bid on the construction of any work advertised shall, on application to the commission, be furnished at actual cost the survey, plans, and estimates for the work.

(b) Bids for the work shall be in writing, sealed, and delivered to the chairman of the commission, together with a certified check for at least five percent of the total amount of the bid. A bid bond in the amount of at least five percent of the total amount of the bid executed by a corporate surety duly authorized to do business in this state and payable to the district may be substituted in lieu of the certified check.

(c) If the bidder's bid is accepted but he refuses to enter into a proper contract and give the performance and payment bond required by Chapter 2253, Government Code, the certified check or bid bond shall be forfeited to the district.

(d) The commission may reject any and all bids.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1448, ch. 404, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1971; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 63.172. FORMAL REQUIREMENTS OF CONTRACT. A contract entered into by the district shall be in writing and signed by the contractors and the commissioners, any two of the commissioners, the executive director of the district, or an authorized representative of the executive director.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1330 (S.B. 1531), Sec. 12, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 63.173. CONTRACTOR'S BOND. The contractor shall execute an adequate bond payable to the commission in the amount of the contract price, conditioned that he will faithfully perform the obligations, agreements, and covenants of the contract and that if he defaults he will pay the district all damages sustained by reason of the default. The bond shall be approved by the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.174. INTEREST IN CONTRACT. The members of the board and the engineer may not be directly or indirectly interested for themselves or as agents in a contract for the construction of a work to be performed by the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.175. SUPERVISION OF WORK. (a) Unless done under the supervision of the United States, all work contracted for by the district shall be done under the supervision of a representative of the district.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 17, eff. May 22, 2019.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 14, eff. May 22, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 15, eff. May 22, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 17, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 63.176. PAYMENT FOR WORK. (a) A representative of the district shall inspect the work being done during its progress, and on completion of the contract, the district shall draw a warrant on the district depository or issue a check in favor of the contractor or the contractor's assignee for the amount of the contract price. The warrant or check shall be paid from the construction and maintenance or operating fund.

(b) If the district considers it advisable, it may contract to pay for the work in partial payments as the work progresses. Partial payments may not be more in the aggregate than the amount allowed under applicable laws. The amount of the work shall be shown by a certificate of a representative of the district.

(c) The provisions of this section do not apply to improvements carried out or performed by the United States.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1448, ch. 404, Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 108 (S.B. 755), Sec. 16, eff. May 22, 2019.

Sec. 63.177. COMMISSION REPORT. (a) The commission shall make an annual report of its activities and file it with the county clerk on or before January 1 of each year.

(b) The report shall show in detail:

(1) the kind, character, and amount of work done in the district;

(2) the cost of the work; and

(3) the amount paid on order, the purpose for which paid, and other data necessary to show the condition of improvements made under the provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.178. FRANCHISES. (a) A district may grant franchises on property owned or controlled by the district to any person for purposes consistent with this chapter and may charge fees for the franchises.

(b) A franchise may be granted for a period of not more than 50 years.

(c) Before the franchise is granted, the commission must approve the franchise by a majority vote at three separate meetings held at least one week apart and must publish notice. The third meeting at which the commission votes to grant a franchise may not take place before the date the notice required by this subsection is published for the third time.

(c-1) For the purposes of Subsection (c), notice must be published at the expense of the applicant, once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the district. The notice must consist of:

(1) the text of the franchise in full; or

(2) a descriptive caption stating the purpose of the franchise and the location at which a complete copy of the franchise may be obtained.

(d) The franchise shall require the grantee to file a written acceptance within 30 days from the day the franchise is finally approved by the commission. Unless the district and the grantee agree on a later date, the effective date of the franchise is the date the grantee files the written acceptance with the commission.

(e) Fees charged for a franchise may be used to pay interest on bonds or other securities issued by the district for construction of its improvements and to retire these bonds or other securities at maturity.

(f) This section shall not be construed to prevent a district from granting revocable licenses or permits for the use of limited portions of waterfront or facilities for purposes consistent with this chapter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1027 (H.B. 2770), Sec. 21, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 427 (S.B. 1395), Sec. 19, eff. June 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1120 (S.B. 1129), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 63.179. ADJACENT LAND. (a) The district may own land adjacent or accessible to the navigable water developed by the district and may lease the land to any person and charge reasonable tolls, fees, or other charges.

(b) Proceeds from the tolls, fees, or other charges may be used for maintenance and operation of the business of the district, to make the district self-supporting and financially solvent, and to return the construction cost of the improvements within a reasonable period.

(c) The land may be located in whole or in part inside or outside the boundaries of any incorporated city, town, or village in this state, but land which is not included inside the boundaries of a city, town, or village at the time it is acquired by the district may not be annexed or included inside the boundaries of the city, town, or village without the written consent of the district evidenced by a resolution adopted by the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.180. ISSUANCE OF WRITS. A writ of mandamus shall issue from a court of competent jurisdiction to compel the commission to apply revenue in accordance with the terms of a contract with the United States, and an injunction may be issued to restrain the commission from violating the provisions of a contract with the United States.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.181. PEACE OFFICERS. The district may appoint peace officers to protect life and property in the district and the property of the district. The officers shall have the same rights, powers, and authority as policemen of a city or town.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 72, ch. 32, Sec. 1, eff. April 15, 1981.

Sec. 63.182. EFFECT ON POLICE POWERS. The provisions of this chapter shall not affect or repeal the police powers of any municipality inside the district or any law, ordinance, or regulation which authorizes the municipality to exercise police power over any navigable stream, aid to navigation, or facility for navigation in the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.183. OTHER LAWS GOVERNING DISTRICT. The commission has the same rights, powers, and duties provided for commissioners in Chapter 62, Transportation Code.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.279, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER E. GENERAL FISCAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 63.221. CONSTRUCTION AND MAINTENANCE FUND. (a) The construction and maintenance fund shall include money received from the sale of bonds and other sources except the tax and other collections deposited in the sinking fund and used to pay interest on the bonds.

(b) All expenses incurred in connection with the creation, establishment, and maintenance of the district after the original petition to create the district is filed shall be paid from the construction and maintenance fund.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.222. DISTRICT DEPOSITORY. The district depository shall be designated as provided by Section 60.271, and the district's funds shall be deposited in the depository.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1400, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 63.224. ACCOUNTS AND RECORDS; AUDIT. (a) A complete book of all accounts and records shall be kept by the district.

(b) In January of each year or as soon after that time as practicable, the county auditor or, in the discretion of the commission, an independent certified public accountant or firm of independent certified public accountants shall be employed to make a complete audit of the books and records and make a report of the findings.

(c) The audit report shall be made in triplicate, and one copy shall be filed with the district office, one with the district depository, and one with the county auditor's office.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.225. DEPOSIT. (a) When the petition to create the district is filed, it shall be accompanied by a $500 deposit, which shall be held by the county clerk until the result of the election to create the district is declared and entered in the minutes of the commissioners court.

(b) If the result of the election favors the creation of the district, the county clerk shall return the $500 deposit to the signers of the petition or their agent or attorney.

(c) If the result of the election is against the creation of the district, the county clerk shall pay the costs and expenses of the proposed district up to and including the election from the $500 deposit on vouchers signed by the county judge and shall return the balance of the deposit, if any, to the signers of the petition or their agent or attorney.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.226. DEBT. (a) The district may retire the original cost of construction of its improvements or pay for the cost of construction by borrowing money and pledging and mortgaging land, wharves, docks, warehouses, grain elevators, bunkering facilities, belt railroads, floating plants, lighterage, towing facilities, and other facilities or aids incident or necessary to the operation or development of ports or waterways.

(b) The district may issue its debentures or other evidences of debt secured by a mortgage for the length of time and a rate of interest of not more than eight percent a year. In addition, the district may secure the debentures, notes or other evidences of debt with bonds of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.227. RETIRING DEBT. Debentures, notes, or other evidences of debt may be retired by rents, tolls, fees, or charges other than taxes. The debt also may be retired by assessments against taxable property in the district which is equitably distributed on the basis of benefits derived by the property from district improvements.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.228. BORROWING MONEY. (a) A district may borrow for any legal purpose from the United States or from any banking institution or other source not more than $250,000 to meet temporary needs, and may issue notes or other short term obligations other than bonds which will mature in not more than 10 years from their date and may pledge any securities owned by them or their surplus revenues.

(b) A district, in the acquisition of land necessary for the development of its ports and waterways both industrial and otherwise, may execute purchase money notes securing same with liens on the land being acquired or with a pledge of surplus revenue, or with both. The notes may bear interest at the rate determined by the commission.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1448, ch. 404, Sec. 3, eff. May 26, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER F. BOND PROVISIONS

Sec. 63.251. LEVY OF TAX. After bonds have been voted, the commission shall levy a tax on all taxable property in the district sufficient to pay principal of and interest on the bonds and shall annually levy and have assessed and collected on the taxable property of the district an amount sufficient to pay for the expense of assessing and collecting the taxes.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.252. FORM OF BONDS. (a) Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued in the name of the district and shall be signed by the chairman of the commission and attested by the secretary, with the district's seal affixed to each bond.

(b) The bonds shall be issued in the denominations and payable annually or semiannually at the time or times, not more than 40 years from their date, that the commission considers most expedient.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.253. APPROVAL OF BONDS BY ATTORNEY GENERAL. (a) Before bonds are offered for sale, the district shall present to the attorney general a certified copy of all the minutes of commission proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, including:

(1) a copy of the notices of hearing and election, together with a certified return of each notice;

(2) a certified copy of the commission's order levying a tax to pay principal of and interest on the bonds;

(3) a statement of the total bonded indebtedness of the district, including the series of bonds and the assessed value of property for the purpose of taxation as shown by the last official assessment of the district; and

(4) any other information which the attorney general requires.

(b) The attorney general shall carefully examine the bonds in connection with the constitution, laws relating to the execution of the bonds, and the facts.

(c) If the attorney general finds that the bonds were issued in conformity with the constitution and laws and that they are valid and binding obligations of the district, he shall certify the bonds.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.254. REGISTRATION OF BONDS. After the bonds are examined and certified by the attorney general, they shall be registered by the comptroller in a book kept for that purpose, and the certificate of the attorney general shall be preserved in the record to be used in the event of litigation.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.255. VALIDITY OF BONDS. (a) After the bonds are certified by the attorney general and registered by the comptroller, they shall be held prima facie valid and binding obligations in every action, suit, or proceeding in which their validity is brought into question.

(b) In any action brought to enforce collection of the bonds or interest on the bonds, the certificate of the attorney general or a certified copy of the certificate shall be received as prima facie evidence of the validity of the bonds and their coupons, and the only defense that can be offered against the validity of the bonds or coupons is forgery or fraud.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.256. SALE OF BONDS. (a) After the bonds are registered, the chairman of the commission shall offer them for sale and shall sell the bonds on the best terms and for the best price possible.

(b) As the bonds are sold, the money received for them shall be paid to the district depository to the credit of the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.257. BOND RECORD. (a) After bonds are issued, the board shall procure and deliver to the secretary of the district a well-bound book for recording the bonds.

(b) The record kept in the book shall include:

(1) the bonds and their numbers;

(2) the amount of the bonds;

(3) the interest rate;

(4) the date of issuance;

(5) the date the bonds become due;

(6) the place where the bonds are payable;

(7) the amount received for each bond; and

(8) the tax levy to pay interest and provide a sinking fund.

(c) The bond record shall be available for public inspection by all interested parties in the district.

(d) On payment of a bond, an entry of the payment shall be made in the bond record.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER G. TAX PROVISIONS

Sec. 63.281. BOND TAX. (a) After bonds have been voted, the commission shall levy and have assessed and collected improvement taxes on all taxable property inside the district.

(b) The tax shall be in an amount which is sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.282. MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION TAX. (a) With the approval of the electors of the district, the commission may levy and have assessed and collected for the maintenance, operation, and upkeep of the district and its improvements an annual tax of not more than 20 cents on the $100 valuation on all taxable property in the district.

(b) The proposition to approve the tax provided in Subsection (a) of this section may be voted on at the election to create the district or may be voted on at a separate election to be held in the manner provided for elections held under Subchapter B of this chapter.

(c) The ballots for the election shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the proposition: "The levy of a tax of not more than 20 cents on the $100 valuation for maintenance, operation, and upkeep of the district and its improvements."

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 1770, ch. 518, Sec. 14, eff. May 31, 1971.

Sec. 63.283. FUNDS FROM SOURCES OTHER THAN TAXES. The district may pay interest on and principal of the bonds and pay the costs of maintenance, operation, and upkeep with revenue from tolls, rents, fees, or charges other than taxation or with assessments made on the property in the district on the basis of benefit derived.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.285. DUTY OF ASSESSOR AND COLLECTOR. The assessor and collector shall assess and collect taxes for the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2321, ch. 841, Sec. 4(r), eff. Jan. 1, 1982.

SUBCHAPTER H. ASSESSMENTS

Sec. 63.321. ASSESSMENTS TO RETIRE DEBT. Assessments which are equitably distributed against property in the district may be used to pay the cost of making improvements and to pay principal of and interest on bonds, notes, debentures, or other evidences of debt issued by the district for improvements.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.322. ORDER TO RETIRE DEBT BY ASSESSMENTS. If the commission decides to retire bonds and other evidences of debt by equitably distributed assessments against the property in the district, it shall enter an order with its findings in the minutes of its proceedings.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.323. NOTICE OF THE ORDER AND HEARING. (a) The commission shall publish notice once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper in the district or, if no newspaper is published in the district, in the newspaper published nearest to the district.

(b) The notice shall include a copy of the order and shall set a date for a hearing at which all property owners and persons interested in the district and the improvements may appear and contest the assessments and offer evidence for or against the assessments before the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.324. HEARING PROCEDURE. (a) All protests, contests, and objections at the hearing shall be presented in writing.

(b) The commission shall summon witnesses when requested to do so and take testimony with reference to the protests, contests, and objections.

(c) The hearing may be adjourned from day to day until all proponents or contestants of the assessments have had full opportunity to present evidence.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.325. FINDINGS. The commission shall enter its findings after the hearing, and if it finds against the proposition of assessments, no further action shall be taken in the matter.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.326. TAX ROLL. (a) If the commission finds in favor of levying assessments, it shall direct the assessor and collector of the district to prepare a roll of all the taxable property in the district in the same manner as assessment for ad valorem taxes.

(b) The assessor and collector shall make an assessment in the proportion of cost to be borne by each item of property on the tax rolls, basing the proportion of cost on benefits to be derived from the improvements by the property and the owner of the property.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.327. BOARD OF EQUALIZATION. (a) If the commission finds in favor of levying assessments, it shall appoint three persons who are electors of the district to be commissioners on the board of equalization and shall designate the time for the meeting of the board of equalization.

(b) The board of equalization shall meet at the time fixed by the commission to receive the assessment lists or books of the district for examination, correction, equalization, and approval.

(c) The secretary of the commission shall act as secretary for the board of equalization and shall keep a permanent record of the proceedings of the board of equalization.

(d) Before beginning to perform the duties of the board of equalization, each member shall take the following oath: "I ______ do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will, to the best of my ability, make a full and complete examination, correction, and equalization of all property contained in the district as shown by the assessment lists or books of the assessor and collector and add all property not included of which I have knowledge."

(e) The oath shall be entered in the minutes by the secretary.

(f) The completed tax roll shall be submitted to the board of equalization.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2321, ch. 841, Sec. 4(r), eff. Jan. 1, 1982.

Sec. 63.328. NOTICE OF HEARING BY BOARD OF EQUALIZATION. Notice of the hearing by the board of equalization shall be published once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the district or, if no newspaper is published in the district, in the newspaper published nearest to the district.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.329. HEARING BY BOARD OF EQUALIZATION. The owners of property shall have an opportunity to present evidence in hearings before the board of equalization. All interested persons shall have an opportunity to appear and present evidence as to the benefits or lack of benefits to property in which they are interested.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2321, ch. 841, Sec. 4(r), eff. Jan. 1, 1982.

Sec. 63.330. FINDINGS OF BOARD OF EQUALIZATION. After all hearings are completed, the board of equalization shall report its findings to the commission for acceptance or disapproval.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.331. DISAPPROVAL OF FINDINGS. If the commission refuses to approve the tax rolls, it shall hold hearings on all items not approved in the manner provided for the board of equalization.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.332. EFFECT OF APPROVAL OF FINDINGS. The approval of the findings of the board of equalization and the tax rolls as finally fixed shall be conclusive except in cases of fraud or the failure to equitably distribute the assessments.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.333. PERSONAL OBLIGATION; LIEN. An assessment is a personal obligation of the property owner against whom the assessment is made, and the district has a lien against the assessed taxable property.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.334. ASSESSMENT FUND. (a) The assessments shall be paid to the assessor and collector and shall be kept by him in a separate fund known as the "Assessment Fund."

(b) Payments out of the fund shall be made to retire the bonds, notes, debentures, or other evidences of debt of the district on vouchers drawn by the commission each year on the maturity of the indebtedness.

(c) The vouchers shall be signed by at least two members of the commission.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.335. ERRORS IN ASSESSMENTS. (a) An error, mistake, or formality in the assessment or in any step or proceeding prerequisite to the assessment shall not invalidate the assessment, but the commission may correct the error at all times.

(b) An error or mistake in describing any parcel or item of property or the name of any owner of property shall not invalidate the assessment, but it shall have full force and effect against the premises and the real and true owner.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.336. REASSESSMENT. (a) If, in the opinion of the commission, an error, mistake, or invalidity exists in any proceeding with reference to the improvements or assessments, it shall correct the error, mistake, or invalidity and reassess the property and the owners of the property.

(b) The reassessment shall be made after the same notice and hearing as provided for the making of an original assessment. The commission in making the reassessment shall take into consideration any enhancement or depreciation in the value of the property assessed and shall make the reassessment on a basis of equalization and the equitable distribution of benefits to the property with respect to all other property in the district.

(c) A reassessment shall not be made later than three years from the date of the original assessment except in the case of fraud or undisclosed ownership of property.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.337. SUIT TO SET ASIDE OR CORRECT ASSESSMENT. (a) A property owner with an assessment or reassessment against him or his property may bring suit within 20 days after the assessment or reassessment in any court with jurisdiction to set aside or correct the assessment or reassessment or any proceeding with reference to the assessment or reassessment due to any error or invalidity.

(b) The cost of a suit to set aside or correct an assessment or reassessment shall be paid by the loser of the litigation.

(c) After the 20-day period following the assessment or reassessment, the owner or his heirs, assigns, or successors do not have a right of action or a defense of invalidity of the assessment or reassessment in any action in which the assessment or reassessment is in question, except in case of fraud.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.338. DELINQUENT ASSESSMENTS. (a) Not later than August 1 of each year, the assessor and collector shall prepare a delinquent roll showing all delinquencies in the payment of the assessments.

(b) The assessor and collector shall post the delinquent roll in the district office for at least 20 days.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.339. SUIT FOR COLLECTION. (a) After the delinquent roll has been posted in the district office for 20 days, the attorney for the district may file suit for collection in any court with jurisdiction.

(b) An attorney's or collection fee of 10 percent on the amount of principal and interest due at the time of filing the suit shall accrue against the property owner and shall be charged as costs of court. The attorney's or collection fee is collectible against the property owner and the property from the date of the filing of the suit.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the suit shall be filed and prosecuted in the same manner as suits for the collection of delinquent ad valorem taxes.

(d) It is not necessary in the suit to specifically plead and prove the orders, notices, rules, and regulations of the commission relating to the assessment or reassessment. It is sufficient for the petition or other pleading to allege that the proceedings with reference to the making of the improvements and the assessments or reassessments were held in compliance with the law and that all prerequisites to the fixing of the assessment lien on the assessed property and the personal liability of the owner were performed.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2321, ch. 841, Sec. 4(r), eff. Jan. 1, 1982.

Sec. 63.340. SALE OF PROPERTY TO SATISFY JUDGMENT. The district may purchase any property at a sale to satisfy a judgment in favor of the district on a delinquent assessment or reassessment, if the district is the best bidder.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

Sec. 63.341. RULES AND REGULATIONS. The commission may adopt any necessary rules, regulations, and orders, which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of the chapter relating to assessments, reassessments, and the collection of assessments.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 110, ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER I. ANNEXATION

Sec. 63.371. ANNEXATION AUTHORITY. A district created under this chapter or converted from a district created under Article III, Section 52 of the Texas Constitution, into a conservation and reclamation district under Article XVI, Section 59 of the Texas Constitution, may extend its boundaries and annex adjacent territory.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.372. PETITION. Before territory is annexed to the district, a petition signed by 50 or a majority of the electors residing in the adjacent territory proposed to be annexed shall be presented to the commission requesting an election in the adjacent territory to determine whether or not the territory will be annexed and whether or not it will assume its pro rata part of the outstanding bonded debt of the district.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.373. SCHEDULING PETITION FOR HEARING; NOTICE. (a) After a petition is presented under Section 63.372 of this code, the commission shall set the petition for a hearing to be held within 10 days from the date of presentation of the petition.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be posted at three public places in the territory proposed to be annexed for at least five days before the hearing on the petition. The notice shall include the time and place of the hearing and the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.374. HEARING. The commission shall hold the hearing on the subject of annexation of adjacent territory by the district, and any person who has taxable property in the territory proposed to be annexed may appear in person or by counsel and offer testimony or argument for or against the inclusion of all or any part of the land proposed to be annexed.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.375. ELECTION ORDER. If after the hearing the commission finds that inclusion of the territory proposed to be annexed would be a direct benefit to all the land in that territory, the commission shall order an election to be held in the territory proposed to be annexed.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.376. NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The election shall be held not less than 20 nor more than 30 days from the day of the election order and after notice is given.

(b) Notice of the election shall be published once a week for 20 days immediately preceding the election in some newspaper published in the territory proposed to be annexed. If no newspaper is published in the territory, notice shall be posted in three public places inside the territory for at least 20 days immediately preceding the election.

(c) The notice:

(1) shall give the time and place or places for holding the election;

(2) shall give the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed; and

(3) may contain the substance of the order of the commission ordering the election.

(d) The secretary of the commission shall have the notice published or posted.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.377. BALLOTS. The ballots for the election shall be printed to allow for voting for or against: "Annexation to the navigation district" and "Assumption of a pro rata part of the bonded debt of the navigation district."

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.378. ELECTION OFFICIALS. The commission shall appoint one judge and two clerks for each election box or place to hold the election. The judge and clerks shall be electors in the territory proposed to be annexed and shall reside near the place for holding the election.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.

Sec. 63.379. CANVASS OF VOTE; ENTRY OF ORDER. (a) The election judges shall certify the election returns to the commission, and the commission shall canvass the returns.

(b) If a majority of the electors voting at the election favor annexation and assumption of the pro rata part of the bonded debt of the district, the commission shall enter an order in its minutes annexing the territory, and from and after the entry of the order, the annexed territory shall be a part of the district with all the rights, benefits, and burdens of property originally situated in the district.

(c) If a majority of the electors voting at the election favor annexation and the proposition to assume the bonded debt fails to carry, the commission shall enter an order in its minutes annexing the territory to the district, and from and after the entry of the order, the annexed territory shall be a part of the district with the exception of the assumption of the outstanding bonded indebtedness. The annexed territory shall be subject to a tax for maintenance and operation and shall be liable for all other bonded indebtedness and other indebtedness thereafter legally imposed by the district.

(d) After an order of annexation has been entered in the minutes of the commission, a certified copy of the order shall be prepared by the secretary of the commission and shall include the boundaries of the territory annexed. The secretary shall record the order or have it recorded in the real estate records of the county or counties in which the territory is located.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1978, ch. 791, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 29, 1977.